Missouri, session 2026, HB2061.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 160 and 173, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto four new
sections, to be known as sections 160.014, 160.015, 173.001, and 173.002, to read as follows:
160.014. 1. The general assembly finds that all persons are equal before the law
and are entitled to equal rights and opportunities under the law pursuant to article I,
section 2 of the Constitution of Missouri and the Fourteenth Amendment to the
Constitution of the United States. The general assembly condemns discrimination in all
forms. Antisemitism is a form of discrimination. The purpose of this section and section
160.015 is to address discrimination, harassment, intimidation, and denial of equal
access arising from antisemitism in educational institutions, consistent with the
constitutional rights of all persons.
2. As used in this section and section 160.015, the following terms mean:
(1) "Antisemitism" or "antisemitic", the International Holocaust Remembrance
Alliance's (IHRA) Working Definition of Antisemitism, including its contemporary
examples, as it was adopted on May 26, 2016, as a tool and guide for recognizing and
combating antisemitism;
(2) "Educational institution", each public school, charter school, and school
district in this state.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

SS HB 2061 2
3. Each educational institution shall treat harassment of or discrimination
against students or employees, or harassment or discrimination resulting from
institutional policies or programs on such educational institution's campuses, that is
motivated by or including antisemitism in an identical manner to discrimination
motivated by race.
4. (1) Each educational institution shall adopt a policy clearly defining
antisemitism utilizing context and other relevant factors into such educational
institution's student, faculty, and employee codes of conduct and shall prohibit such
conduct at or by such educational institution if such conduct creates an atmosphere or
circumstance in which individuals working at, visiting, or attending the educational
institution and the educational institution's services and facilities either by physically
impeding such activity or by creating an atmosphere of fear or intimidation.
(2) Prohibited conduct as it relates specifically to antisemitism shall be
incorporated into such educational institution's student, faculty, and employee codes of
conduct and shall include penalties for harassment of and discrimination against Jews
in compliance with antidiscrimination regulations promulgated under Title VI of the
federal Civil Rights Act of 1964, as amended, by the United States Department of
Education and the United States Department of Justice.
5. (1) Criticism of Israel that is similar to criticism toward any other country
shall not be construed to be antisemitic. In determining a complaint regarding possible
antisemitic speech relating to criticism of Israel, the educational institution shall
consider whether the speech is explicitly related to public policy or applies materially
inconsistent standards, expectations, or condemnation to Israel as compared with other
nations in comparable circumstances. Such consideration shall be one factor among the
totality of the circumstances and shall not be independently determinative of whether
the speech is antisemitic. This section shall only apply if the conduct relating to the
speech is also determined to have created an atmosphere or circumstance in which
individuals working at, visiting, or attending the educational institution and the
educational institution's services and facilities either by physically impeding such
activity or by creating an atmosphere of fear or intimidation.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be applied in ways that diminish or infringe
upon any right protected under the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United
States or the Constitution of Missouri.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to conflict with federal or state
discrimination laws.

SS HB 2061 3
160.015. 1. (1) No educational institution shall discriminate because of race,
ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital status against a student or
an employee in the state system of public elementary and secondary education.
(2) No person in this state shall, on the basis of race, ethnicity, national origin,
sex, disability, religion, or marital status, be excluded from participation in, denied the
benefits of, or subjected to discrimination under any program or activity or in any
employment conditions or practices conducted by an educational institution that
receives or benefits from federal or state financial assistance.
2. An educational institution's criteria for admission to a program or course
shall not have the effect of restricting access by persons of a particular race, ethnicity,
national origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital status.
3. (1) All of an educational institution's classes shall be available to all students
without regard to race, ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital
status.
(2) This subsection shall not be construed to eliminate the provision of programs
designed to meet the needs of students with limited proficiency in English, gifted
students, or students with disabilities or programs tailored to students with special
needs.
4. Guidance services, counseling services, and financial assistance services in an
educational institution shall be available to all students equally and provided in the
same manner regardless of race, ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or
marital status.
5. All education programs, activities, and opportunities offered by educational
institutions shall be made available without discrimination on the basis of race,
ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital status.
6. (1) Nothing in this section shall be applied in ways that diminish or infringe
upon any right protected under the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United
States or the Constitution of Missouri.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to conflict with federal or state
discrimination laws.
7. (1) Each educational institution shall report incidents and complaints of
antisemitic discrimination or harassment to the Title VI coordinator at the department
of elementary and secondary education.
(2) The Title VI coordinator shall establish, maintain, and publicize a formal
reporting process by which students, parents, staff, and faculty can submit complaints
of antisemitic discrimination and harassment.

SS HB 2061 4
(3) The Title VI coordinator shall thoroughly investigate all complaints made
under this subsection. After a reasonable investigation, if the coordinator determines
that an educational institution has engaged in, allowed, or failed to sufficiently prohibit
antisemitic discrimination or harassment in a manner consistent with the educational
institution's policy adopted under subsection 3 of section 160.014, the department of
elementary and secondary education shall notify, in writing, the educational institution
of such determination and that such educational institution is required to address the
issues described in such determination within thirty days after receipt of such written
notice.
(4) After the expiration of the thirty days to address issues in the coordinator's
determination, if the Title VI coordinator determines the educational institution has
failed to take the necessary actions to address such issues, the department of elementary
and secondary education shall report the coordinator's determination to the United
States Department of Education and the United States Department of Justice by making
a complaint under Title VI of the federal Civil Rights Act of 1964, as amended.
(5) The Title VI coordinator shall compile an annual report on complaints of
antisemitic discrimination and harassment as well as other Title VI complaints
monitored, reported, and investigated under this section. Such report shall be published
on the website of the department of elementary and secondary education and submitted
to the general assembly before July first of each year.
173.001. 1. The general assembly finds that all persons are equal before the law
and are entitled to equal rights and opportunities under the law pursuant to article I,
section 2 of the Constitution of Missouri and the Fourteenth Amendment to the
Constitution of the United States. The general assembly condemns discrimination in all
forms. Antisemitism is a form of discrimination. The purpose of this section and section
173.002 is to address discrimination, harassment, intimidation, and denial of equal
access arising from antisemitism in educational institutions, consistent with the
constitutional rights of all persons.
2. As used in this section and section 173.002, the following terms mean:
(1) "Antisemitism" or "antisemitic", the International Holocaust Remembrance
Alliance's (IHRA) Working Definition of Antisemitism, including its contemporary
examples, as it was adopted on May 26, 2016, as a tool and guide for recognizing and
combating antisemitism;
(2) "Educational institution", a public postsecondary educational institution
governed or supervised by a:
(a) Board erected under chapter 172, 174, 175, or 178;
(b) Board of trustees of a community college; or

SS HB 2061 5
(c) State board for any other technical school.
3. Each educational institution shall treat harassment of or discrimination
against students or employees, or harassment or discrimination resulting from
institutional policies or programs on such educational institution's campuses, that is
motivated by or including antisemitism in an identical manner to discrimination
motivated by race.
4. (1) Each educational institution shall adopt a policy clearly defining
antisemitism utilizing context and other relevant factors into such educational
institution's student, faculty, and employee codes of conduct and shall prohibit such
conduct at or by such educational institution if such conduct creates an atmosphere or
circumstance in which individuals working at, visiting, or attending the educational
institution and the educational institution's services and facilities either by physically
impeding such activity or by creating an atmosphere of fear or intimidation.
(2) Prohibited conduct as it relates specifically to antisemitism shall be
incorporated into such educational institution's student, faculty, and employee codes of
conduct and shall include penalties for harassment of and discrimination against Jews
in compliance with antidiscrimination regulations promulgated under Title VI of the
federal Civil Rights Act of 1964, as amended, by the United States Department of
Education and the United States Department of Justice.
5. (1) Criticism of Israel that is similar to criticism toward any other country
shall not be construed to be antisemitic. In determining a complaint regarding possible
antisemitic speech relating to criticism of Israel, the educational institution shall
consider whether the speech is explicitly related to public policy or applies materially
inconsistent standards, expectations, or condemnation to Israel as compared with other
nations in comparable circumstances. Such consideration shall be one factor among the
totality of the circumstances and shall not be independently determinative of whether
the speech is antisemitic. This section shall only apply if the conduct relating to the
speech is also determined to have created an atmosphere or circumstance in which
individuals working at, visiting, or attending the educational institution and the
educational institution's services and facilities either by physically impeding such
activity or by creating an atmosphere of fear or intimidation.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be applied in ways that diminish or infringe
upon any right protected under the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United
States or the Constitution of Missouri.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to conflict with federal or state
discrimination laws.

SS HB 2061 6
173.002. 1. (1) No educational institution shall discriminate because of race,
ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital status against a student or
an employee in the state system of public postsecondary education.
(2) No person in this state shall, on the basis of race, ethnicity, national origin,
sex, disability, religion, or marital status, be excluded from participation in, denied the
benefits of, or subjected to discrimination under any program or activity or in any
employment conditions or practices conducted by an educational institution that
receives or benefits from federal or state financial assistance.
2. An educational institution's criteria for admission to a program or course
shall not have the effect of restricting access by persons of a particular race, ethnicity,
national origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital status.
3. (1) All of an educational institution's classes shall be available to all students
without regard to race, ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital
status.
(2) This subsection shall not be construed to eliminate the provision of programs
designed to meet the needs of students with limited proficiency in English, gifted
students, or students with disabilities or programs tailored to students with special
needs.
4. Guidance services, counseling services, and financial assistance services in an
educational institution shall be available to all students equally and provided in the
same manner regardless of race, ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or
marital status.
5. All education programs, activities, and opportunities offered by educational
institutions shall be made available without discrimination on the basis of race,
ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital status.
6. (1) Nothing in this section shall be applied in ways that diminish or infringe
upon any right protected under the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United
States or the Constitution of Missouri.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to conflict with federal or state
discrimination laws.
7. (1) Each educational institution shall report incidents and complaints of
antisemitic discrimination or harassment to the Title VI coordinator of the coordinating
board for higher education under the department of higher education and workforce
development.
(2) The Title VI coordinator shall establish, maintain, and publicize a formal
reporting process by which students, parents, staff, and faculty can submit complaints
of antisemitic discrimination and harassment.

SS HB 2061 7
(3) The Title VI coordinator shall thoroughly investigate all complaints made
under this subsection. After a reasonable investigation, if the coordinator determines
that an educational institution has engaged in, allowed, or failed to sufficiently prohibit
antisemitic discrimination or harassment in a manner consistent with the educational
institution's policy adopted under subsection 3 of section 173.001, the coordinating
board for higher education shall notify, in writing, the educational institution of such
determination and that such educational institution is required to address the issues
described in such determination within thirty days after receipt of such written notice.
(4) After the expiration of the thirty days to address issues in the coordinator's
determination, if the Title VI coordinator determines the educational institution has
failed to take the necessary actions to address such issues, the coordinating board for
higher education shall report the coordinator's determination to the United States
Department of Education and the United States Department of Justice by making a
complaint under Title VI of the federal Civil Rights Act of 1964, as amended, except that
those complaints solely containing instances of political or religious speech protected
under the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution
of Missouri shall not be reported, compiled, or published by the coordinating board for
higher education.
(5) The Title VI coordinator shall compile an annual report on complaints,
except those complaints that solely contain instances of political or religious speech
protected under the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States or the
Constitution of Missouri, of antisemitic discrimination and harassment as well as other
Title VI complaints monitored, reported, and investigated under this section. Such
report shall be published on the website of the coordinating board for higher education
and submitted to the general assembly before July first of each year.
(6) No educational institution shall create a list, registry, or database of students
based on their religious or political views, opinions, or expressions, which are protected
under the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution
of Missouri.
✔